Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.300

Abandonment—Method.

The sufficiency of the petition for abandonment of the council-manager form of government shall be determined, the election ordered and conducted, and the results declared generally as provided for the procedure for reorganizing under the council-manager plan so far as those provisions are applicable.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.300. Prior: 1943 c 271 s 23, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-32, part.]

NOTES:

Organization on council-manager plan: RCW 35.18.240 through 35.18.285.